dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX I   oi          oeset      oi
SFX I   oi          oesai      oi
SFX I   oi          oesem      oi
SFX I   oi          oesech     oi
SFX I   oi          oesent     oi
SFX I   oi          oesid      oi
SFX I   oi          oed        oi
SFX I   oi          owyf       oi
SFX I   oi          oech       oi
SFX I   oi          o          oi
SFX I   oi          o'i        oi
SFX I   oi          o'u        oi
SFX I   oi          o'ch       oi
SFX I   oi          o'n        oi
SFX I   oi          o'r        oi
SFX I   oi          ôm         oi
SFX I   oi          och        oi
SFX I   oi          ônt        oi
SFX I   oi          oer        oi
SFX I   oi          oes        oi
SFX I   oi          oest       oi
SFX I   oi          oith       oi
SFX I   oi          oiff       oi
SFX I   oi          oon        oi
SFX I   oi          oan        oi
